Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3576
Hospital districts; merger; voter approval; order.

If after canvassing the returns for each county the county board determines that the merger has been approved by a majority of the voters in each district, the county board shall enter an order for the merger of the districts.

Laws 1978, LB 560, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.126.